Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-215 Transaction of an insurance
business. Transaction of an insurance business means any of the following
acts in this State effected by mail or otherwise by or on behalf of an
insurer. The venue of an act committed by mail is at the point where the
matter transmitted by mail is delivered and takes effect. Unless otherwise
indicated, the term insurer as used in this definition includes all
corporations, associations, partnerships, and individuals, engaged as
principals in the business of insurance and also includes reciprocal insurers.

(1) The making of or proposing to make, as an
insurer, an insurance contract;

(2) The making of or proposing to make, as guarantor
or surety, any contract of guaranty or suretyship as a vocation and not merely
incidental to any other legitimate business or activity of the guarantor or
surety;

(3) The taking or receiving of any application for
insurance;

(4) The receiving or collection of any premium,
commission, membership fees, assessments, dues or other consideration for any
insurance or any part thereof;

(5) The issuance or delivery of contracts of
insurance to residents of this State or to persons authorized to do business in
this State;

(6) The transaction of any kind of insurance business
specifically recognized as transacting an insurance business under this code;
or

(7) The transacting or proposing to transact any
insurance business in substance equivalent to any of the foregoing in a manner
designed to evade the provisions of this code. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next